West Virginia, session 2026, SB341.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 9 - 1. Board of Landscape Architects. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-22-7 of this code, relating to the Board of Landscape Architects (fees, 9 CSR 03), is authorized.